District of Columbia statutes.
29-402.06

Bylaws.

(a)

The incorporators or the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation may adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

(b)

The bylaws of a nonprofit corporation may contain any provision for managing the activities and regulating the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History